Washington statutes.
RCW 3.58.040

Travel expenses.

District judges, judges pro tempore, court commissioners, and district court employees shall receive their reasonable traveling expenses when engaged in the business of the court as provided in chapter 42.24 RCW.

[ 1984 c 258 s 37; 1983 c 3 s 3; 1961 c 299 s 103.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.